Hawaii statutes.
[§11-411] Criminal referral. In
lieu of an administrative determination that a violation of this part has been
committed, the commission may refer the complaint to the attorney general or
county prosecutor at any time it believes the respondent may have recklessly,
knowingly, or intentionally committed a violation. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next